Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Charter School Facilities.

Sec. 14.11.121.
Supplemental charter school facilities construction, lease, and major maintenance grant program.

The department shall establish a charter school facilities construction, lease, and major maintenance grant program that supplements grant aid otherwise available under this chapter and that is based on a per pupil funding formula.

The department shall apply for available federal funding and award federal funding made available under the grant program established under (a) of this section for not more than five years for approved projects for charter school facilities construction, lease, or major maintenance as follows:

90 percent of the allowable costs for the first fiscal year for the approved project;

80 percent of the allowable costs for the second fiscal year for the approved project;

60 percent of the allowable costs for the third fiscal year for the approved project;

40 percent of the allowable costs for the fourth fiscal year for the approved project; and

20 percent of the allowable costs for the fifth fiscal year for the approved project.

The grant program established in this section is subject to legislative appropriation and available funding and must be consistent with applicable federal and state requirements.

A school district or regional educational attendance area that submits an application for a proposed project under AS

14.11.011

for funding under this section that is approved for funding by the department shall provide a participating share that is equal to the difference between the allowable costs of a project and the combined available federal funding and the state aid provided under AS

14.11.126

. Allowable costs for a project approved under this section shall be based on the adjusted student count for a charter school calculated under AS

14.17.450(a)

and (c), as determined by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 91 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 91, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective September 19, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of this section by sec. 3, ch. 91, SLA 2010, which was to take effect July 1, 2015, was repealed by sec. 49, ch. 15, SLA 2014.

Sec. 14.11.125.
Public school facilities construction advance account. [Repealed, § 15 ch 5 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 14.11.126.
State aid for costs of charter school facilities construction, lease, and major maintenance.

During each fiscal year, the state shall allocate to a school district and regional educational attendance area that is approved for a charter school facilities construction, lease, or major maintenance grant under AS

14.11.121

an amount that is not less than $1 for each pupil enrolled in the charter school.

History.

(§ 2 ch 91 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 91, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective September 19, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of this section by sec. 3, ch. 91, SLA 2010, which was to take effect July 1, 2015, was repealed by sec. 49, ch. 15, SLA 2014.